North Carolina, session 2025, HB442.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

RESTORE FLOUNDER AND RED SNAPPER SEASONS
SECTION 1.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly makes the following findings:
(1) In 2024, the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental
Quality issued proclamations limiting the recreational harvest of flounder to
four days in joint fishing waters and the recreational harvest of red snapper to
one day.
(2) The recreational fishing industry contributes significantly to the economy of
coastal North Carolina.
(3) North Carolina's restrictions on recreational fishing of flounder and red
snapper are more stringent than any other southeastern state from Virginia to
Texas.
(4) There is considerable overlap in the fish population between southeastern
counties of the State, such as Brunswick County, and South Carolina.
(5) Higher creel and season limits in South Carolina in 2024 give that state a
significant competitive advantage in the competition for recreational fishing
tourism.
(6) State policies regarding recreational catch and release reporting and data
analysis overestimate overall mortality, thus skewing the science on the
flounder fishery.
(7) Coastal fishing charters or individual boats report catching large amounts of
these species by accident and having to release them, indicating the
populations are plentiful.
(8) These unnecessarily strict and possibly unscientific restrictions on the
recreational fishing industry force recreational fishing customers and captains
to move much of their business to South Carolina and Virginia.
*H442-v-4*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(b) Directive. – Notwithstanding G.S. 113-221.1 and
G.S. 143B-289.52 and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Fisheries Director (as
defined in G.S. 113-251), the Marine Fisheries Commission (Commission), and the Division of
Marine Fisheries of the Department of Environmental Quality (Division) shall do all of the
following:
(1) Undertake a supplement to the Southern Flounder Fishery Management Plan
to increase recreational and commercial access to the southern flounder
resource by allowing a recreational harvest season not less than six weeks
between May 15 and November 15 of each year with a limit of one fish per
person per day, and no seasonal limit; and set a commercial quota with a total
allowed catch of 750,000 pounds with quota overages in one year deducted
from the following year's quota and any unused quota in one year added to the
following year's quota. All other size and manner of take limits, season
opening dates, area designations, and specific area and gear sub-allocations
implemented through Amendment 3 to the Southern Flounder Fishery
Management Plan shall continue to apply.
(2) Allow a year-round red snapper season with a limit of two fish per person per
day and a 20-inch minimum size limit in State waters.
(3) By July 1, 2026, complete a southern flounder stock assessment based on the
most recent years of available data.
SECTION 2. Report. – The Division shall report the results of the southern flounder
stock assessment no later than August 1, 2026, to the chairs and members of the House Wildlife
Resources Committee and the Senate Agriculture, Energy, and Environment Committee and shall
annually report no later than August 1 thereafter with an assessment of progress in rebuilding the
southern flounder stock and an estimated time line of further increasing recreational and
commercial access to the southern flounder resource.

PROHIBIT SHRIMP TRAWLING IN ALL INSHORE FISHING WATERS AND
WITHIN ONE-HALF MILE OF THE SHORELINE
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 113-187(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Any person in charge of a commercial fishing operation conducted in violation of the
following provisions of this Subchapter or the following rules of the Marine Fisheries
Commission; and any person in charge of any vessel used in violation of the following provisions
of the Subchapter or the following rules, shall be guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor. The
violations of the statute or the rules for which the penalty is mandatory are:
(1) Taking or attempting to take, possess, sell, or offer for sale any oysters,
mussels, or clams taken from areas closed by statute, rule, or proclamation
because of suspected pollution.
(2) Taking or attempting to take or have in possession aboard a vessel, shrimp
taken by the use of a trawl net, in areas not opened to shrimping, pulled by a
vessel not showing lights required by G.S. 75A-6 after sunset and before
sunrise.
(3) Using a trawl net in any coastal fishing waters closed by proclamation or rule
to trawl nets.
(3a) Taking or attempting to take shrimp using a trawl net in any coastal fishing
waters other than areas of the Atlantic Ocean located more than one-half mile
from the shoreline.
(4) Violating the provisions of a special permit or gear license issued by the
Department.
Page 2 House Bill 442-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Using or attempting to use any trawl net, long haul seine, swipe net,
mechanical methods for oyster or clam harvest or dredge in designated
primary nursery areas."
SECTION 3.(b) The Marine Fisheries Commission shall adopt temporary and
permanent rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

SEVERABILITY AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.(a) If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications
of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end,
the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 4.(b) Effective Date; Expiration. – Except as otherwise provided, this act
is effective when it becomes law. Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire August 1, 2029.
House Bill 442-Fourth Edition Page 3